Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 4
NATURAL AREAS

12-3-90. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Natural Areas Act."

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 330, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 750, § 1.)

12-3-91. Legislative findings and declaration of purpose.

The General Assembly finds that there is an increasing nation-wide concern over the deterioration of man's natural environment in rural as well as urban areas; that there is a serious need to study the long-term effects of our civilization on our natural environment; that while the State of Georgia is still richly endowed with relatively undisturbed natural areas, these areas are rapidly being drastically modified and even destroyed by human activities; that it is of the utmost importance to preserve examples of such areas in their natural state, not only for scientific and educational purposes but for the general well-being of our society and its people. Therefore, it shall be the purpose and function of the Department of Natural Resources to:

Identify natural areas in the State of Georgia which are of unusual ecological significance;

Use its influence and take any steps within its power to secure the preservation of such areas in an undisturbed natural state in order that such areas may:

Be studied scientifically;

Be used for educational purposes;

Serve as examples of nature to the general public; and

Enrich the quality of our environment for present and future generations; and

Recommend areas or parts of areas for recreational use.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 750, § 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1511.)

12-3-92. "Natural areas" defined.

As used in this article, the term "natural areas" means a tract of land in its natural state which may be set aside and permanently protected or managed for the purpose of the preservation of native plant or animal communities, rare or valuable individual members of such communities, or any other natural features of significant scientific, educational, geological, ecological, or scenic value.

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 750, § 3.)

12-3-93. Powers and duties of department as to natural areas.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Natural Resources under this article, and it shall have the power and authority, to:

Determine the acceptance or rejection of areas of special scientific interest that may be offered as a donation by individuals or organizations for preservation;

Make recommendations to appropriate federal agencies or national scientific organizations of areas in the state that are considered worthy to be listed as natural areas of national importance;

Prepare and publish in print or electronically an official state list of natural areas available for research and the teachings of conservation and natural history and recommend publication of studies made in connection with these areas;

Cooperate with federal agencies, other states, counties, or organizations concerned with purposes similar to those to be carried out by the department under this article; and

Take such other action as may be deemed advisable to facilitate the administration, development, maintenance, or protection of the natural area system or any part or parts thereof.

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 330, § 7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1511; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.)

12-3-94. Appropriation of funds to department.

Any funds necessary to carry out this article shall come from funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the department for the purposes expressed in this article.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 750, § 4.)